Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Part 1

Recording

20-9-101. Appointment of court reporter.

Upon the trial of any cause or proceeding in any court of record, upon the request of either party, the judge of such court shall appoint a competent court reporter, who shall first be duly sworn to make a true, impartial and complete stenographic report of all the oral testimony given in trial of the cause or proceeding, as well as the rulings of the judge.

Acts 1887, ch. 217, § 1; Shan., § 4695; Code 1932, § 8825; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1304; Acts 1994, ch. 897, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Costs, § 32; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 71.

Cited: Burns v. Nashville, 142 Tenn. 541, 221 S.W. 828, 1919 Tenn. LEXIS 80 (1920); Slaughter v. Slaughter, 922 S.W.2d 115, 1995 Tenn. App. LEXIS 806 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1995); Joelton Planning & Zoning Comm. v. Metro. Gov't of Nashville & Davidson County, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 867 (Tenn. Ct. App. Dec. 21, 2009).

Collateral References.

Right to have reporter's notes read to jury. 50 A.L.R.2d 176.

Trial
23.

20-9-102. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-9-102 (Acts 1887, ch. 217, §§ 1, 3; Shan., § 4696; Code 1932, § 8826; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1305), concerning stenographer's report as bill of exceptions, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 538, § 1. See T.R.A.P. 24.

20-9-103. Compensation of court reporter.

The party alone at whose instance the court reporter was employed shall be responsible for the court reporter's compensation for the work done by the court reporter.

Acts 1887, ch. 217, § 2; Shan., § 4697; Code 1932, § 8827; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1306; Acts 1994, ch. 897, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.33.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Costs, § 32.

Cited: State v. Hurley, 712 S.W.2d 493, 1986 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 2601 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1986); Slaughter v. Slaughter, 922 S.W.2d 115, 1995 Tenn. App. LEXIS 806 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1995).

20-9-104. Tape recording of proceedings.

It is lawful for attorneys representing parties in proceedings in any of the courts of this state to use tape recorders as an aid in making notes of the proceedings.

Acts 1972, ch. 684, § 1; T.C.A., § 20-1331.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 7.11, 7.15, 24.33.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law in Tennessee in 1972 — A Critical Survey — IV. Procedure (Joseph G. Cook), 40 Tenn. L. Rev. 583.

Cited: Houston v. Scott, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 33 (Tenn. Ct. App. Jan. 17, 2012).

Collateral References.

Use in state court by counsel or party of tape recorder or other electronic device to make transcript of criminal trial proceedings. 67 A.L.R.3d 1013.